Montana, session 2025, HB563.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Complaint filing protected -- unprofessional conduct. (1) A contract or agreement
provision is void if it prohibits, discourages, or otherwise bars or purports to bar:
(a) the filing or pursuing of a complaint allowable under 37-1-308 or 37-1-402; or
(b) an individual from participating in or cooperating with an investigation of a complaint filed under
37-1-308 or 37-1-402.
(2) It is unprofessional conduct for a licensee to:
(a) be party to a contract or agreement in violation of this section; or
(b) retaliate against a person for filing a complaint allowable under 37-1-308 or 37-1-402.
(3) This section does not apply to general waivers of claims. General waivers of claims may not be
interpreted to apply to complaints allowable under 37-1-308 or 37-1-402.
Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title
37, chapter 1, part 1, and the provisions of Title 37, chapter 1, part 1, apply to [section 1].
Section 3. Saving clause. [This act] does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that
were incurred, or proceedings that were begun before [the effective date of this act].
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 563
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 563
Section 4. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 563
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 563, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 563
INTRODUCED BY S. FITZPATRICK
AN ACT PROTECTING THE FILING OF OR PARTICIPATION IN LICENSING COMPLAINT INVESTIGATIONS;
VOIDING CONTRACTS BARRING THE FILING OF OR PARTICIPATION IN LICENSING COMPLAINT
INVESTIGATIONS; ESTABLISHING UNPROFESSIONAL CONDUCT; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE
EFFECTIVE DATE.”